Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,101
Grants to microloan delivery organization; use.

Grants made by the department or agent to a microloan delivery organization may be used to:

(1) Satisfy matching fund requirements for other federal or private grants;

(2) Establish a revolving loan fund from which the microloan delivery organization may make loans to microenterprises;

(3) Establish a guaranty fund from which the microloan delivery organization may guarantee loans made by commercial lending institutions to microenterprises; and

(4) Provide funding for the operating costs of a microloan delivery organization.

Laws 1997, LB 327, § 7.